Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.117.055

Training for disadvantaged populations.

Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office, with approval from the employment security department and the apprenticeship and training council pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW, shall contract with at least one nongovernmental entity to provide quality training, employment navigation, and supportive services to disadvantaged populations seeking to complete apprenticeships and preapprenticeships through the passport to apprenticeship opportunities program. The nongovernmental entity shall also disburse state financial assistance under RCW 28B.117.030(5) to meet registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship entrance requirements and occupational-specific costs.

[ 2018 c 232 s 8.]

NOTES:

Recommendation—2018 c 232 ss 6 and 8: See note following RCW 28B.77.250.

Short title—2018 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.117.010.